Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1429.03
Self-service display; restrictions on use; violation; penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and section 28-1429.02, it shall be unlawful to sell or distribute cigarettes, cigars, electronic nicotine delivery systems, alternative nicotine products, or tobacco in any form whatever through a self-service display. Any person violating this section is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. In addition, upon conviction for a second or subsequent offense within a twelve-month period, the court shall order a six-month suspension of the license issued under section 28-1421.

(2) Cigarettes, cigars, electronic nicotine delivery systems, alternative nicotine products, or tobacco in any form whatever may be sold or distributed in a self-service display that is located in a tobacco specialty store or cigar shop as defined in section 53-103.08.

Laws 2014, LB863, § 22;

Laws 2015, LB118, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB149, § 12;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 11.